California statutes. Education Code
(3) In the event that two or more nonstate-aided districts acquire territory from the state-aided district the Controller shall determine the formulae for apportioning liability for the annual repayment between the districts affected (including the formulae for determining what assessed valuations shall be used within the affected districts or territories withdrawn, and the dates of determination thereof) as will in his or her opinion best comply with the principles set forth above, irrespective of whether the formulae are in literal compliance therewith. The same percentage of annual repayment for which a district is liable at the time the liability apportionment is made shall (unless and until the liability apportionment is subsequently changed pursuant to this paragraph) be deemed applicable to the liability of the district for the balance (as of the date the liability apportionment is made) due on the final apportionment to the state-aided district. The liability for the balance shall, with respect to any affected district, be hereinafter referred to as the “maximum” for the district.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature that the foregoing “maximums” shall be applied by the Controller both retroactively and prospectively, provided that as a result of the application (1) no cash refund shall be made to any district; (2) in the event any district has, in the past, paid an amount greater than its “maximum,” assuming this paragraph and others to which it is referable had been in effect at that time, the excess shall be credited by the Controller against any apportionment balances for which the district is or may hereafter become liable; and (3) the Controller shall make retroactively any adjustments in the amounts due from any other district by virtue of any adjustments made under (2) above. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any computations required to be made pursuant to this paragraph shall not be reflected in any changes in deductions required to be made pursuant to Section 16080 prior to January 1, 1966.

If any subsection, clause, sentence or phrase of this section is for any reason held to be unconstitutional that decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this section. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have adopted this section and each subsection, sentence, clause or phrase thereof irrespective of the fact that any one or more subsections, clauses, sentences, or phrases be declared unconstitutional.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15793.

Whenever, subsequent to the date on which a conditional apportionment becomes final, any territory is withdrawn from a nonstate-aided district and annexed to the state-aided district, the assessed valuation in the territory so annexed shall be included with the valuation of the state-aided district for the purposes of making the computations provided by Sections 15729 to 15733.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15794.

The Controller shall compute, in accordance with Sections 15791, 15792, and 15793, the amount of the annual repayment due the state on account of the apportionment or apportionments to each state-aided district and shall deduct from the respective apportionments made from the State School Fund under Sections 46304, 46305, and 92 or 41050, Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive, to the state-aided district and an acquiring district the portion thereof for which each is liable under this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15795.

(a) When, after any application is filed, the applicant district is annexed to, or, by change of boundaries or otherwise, is included in whole or in part in another district or districts, the superintendent of schools of the county having jurisdiction over the applicant district shall, within 10 days after the effective date of the annexation, inclusion, or change of boundaries, file a certificate with the board, in writing, in the form that the board shall prescribe, setting forth each of the following:

(1) The effective date of the annexation, inclusion, or change of boundaries.

(2) Identification of the area of the school district affected by such change and the name of the school district or districts in which such area is included as a result thereof.

(3) Any additional information in any form that the board may require.

(b) The board shall, upon receiving the appropriate certificate from a county superintendent of schools as provided herein, promptly notify the Controller, in writing, of each of the following:

(1) The effective date of annexation or other inclusion of a state-aided district by an acquiring district.

(2) The name of the state-aided district.

(3) The name of the acquiring district.

(4) The number and other identification of the apportionment affected.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. State School Building Finance Committee [15900. - 15909.]

15900.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide aid to school districts of the state, the State School Building Finance Committee, created by Section 15909, shall be and it hereby is authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the state in the manner and to the extent hereinafter provided, but not otherwise, nor in excess thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

15909.

There is hereby created a State School Building Finance Committee composed of the Governor, Controller, Treasurer, Director of Finance, and Superintendent of Public Instruction, all of whom shall serve thereon without compensation and a majority of whom shall be empowered to act for the committee. Two Members of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two Members of the Assembly appointed by the speaker, shall meet and advise with the committee to the extent that the advisory participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature. For the purposes of this chapter, these Members of the Legislature shall constitute an interim investigation committee on the subject of this chapter and as such shall have the powers and duties imposed upon these committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and the Assembly. The Director of Finance shall provide any assistance to the State School Building Finance Committee that it may require. The Attorney General of the state shall be the legal adviser of the State School Building Finance Committee.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. State School Building Aid Law of 1952 [16000. - 16344.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [16000. - 16105.]

16000.

This chapter may be cited as the State School Building Aid Law of 1952.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16001.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is in the interest of the state and of the people thereof for the state to aid school districts of the state in providing necessary schoolsites and buildings for the pupils of the public school system, this system being a matter of general concern inasmuch as the education of the children of the state is an obligation and function of the state.

In adopting this chapter, the Legislature considers that the great need in school construction is for classrooms for the education of the
 pupils of the public school system. It is the intent of the Legislature to first satisfy this primary need to the greatest extent possible before providing additional educational facilities, regardless of how desirable such additional facilities may be. To the end that school classrooms may be made available at once and to all school districts in need of such classrooms, provisions for other needed school facilities is necessarily subordinated.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Board” means the State Allocation Board.

(b) “Director” means the Director of Education for kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the term “project” shall be deemed to include any or all of the purposes for which a school district has applied for apportionments under this chapter, pursuant to any
 regulations that the State Allocation Board may adopt.

(d) “Grade level maintained by a district” means any of the following:

(1) The kindergarten, if any, and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, or grades 1 to 8, inclusive, maintained by an elementary school district or a unified school district.

(2) Grades 7 to 12, inclusive, grades 9 to 12, inclusive, or grades 7 to 10, inclusive, maintained by a high school district or unified school district.

However, not more than one grade level shall be claimed by any district under any one of the paragraphs of this subdivision.

(e) “Apportionment” means an apportionment made under this chapter unless the context otherwise requires. The term “apportionment” in Sections 16091,
 16097, 16099, 16100, 16104, 16105, and any other section in this chapter where the context justifies, shall be deemed to include funds of a school district required by the board to be contributed toward the purposes thereof. It is hereby declared that this construction is not intended as a change in the present law but rather as a declaration of existing law.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16002.5.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term “basic bond requirement,” means 5 percent of the assessed valuation of taxable property of the district for each grade level maintained by a district, as shown by the last equalized assessment of the county or counties in which the district is located, and as modified by Section 41201 or Section 84201.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16003.

With respect to applications filed on and after the effective date of this section by a unified district and any apportionments and repayments made under the applications, “grade level maintained by the district” means the kindergarten, if any, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, maintained by the district.

A unified district if otherwise eligible, may apply for and receive an apportionment for either one or both of the grade levels.

This section shall not apply to a unified district
 during the first three years following the effective date of this section, or during the first three fiscal years in which the district is in existence for all purposes, if the governing board of the district transmits to the board a written notice stating the district desires to be exempted from this section during that period.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16004.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the board shall review each application and shall take action to insure that apportionments are not made that will provide for construction of permanent facilities to meet temporary peak enrollments at any site or at any grade level. In cases deemed by the board to be hardship cases involving high school or unified school districts where the district will not be able to house high school pupils under basic area limitation formulas prescribed in this chapter, the board may make apportionments for high
 school facilities in excess of the limitations. In that event, the board may provide for the construction of portable facilities at any particular site for which the apportionments are made, particularly where the board determines that there will be, within a six- to nine-year period immediately following the apportionment for facilities at the site, a diminution in enrollment at the site justifying relocation of facilities. In no event shall the board have any authority to make an apportionment for construction area at a high school attendance center which, when added to the area of adequate school construction at that center, would exceed the area permitted therefor by Sections 16053 and 16054.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16005.

The Director of General Services shall administer this chapter and shall provide any assistance to the board that it may require.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16006.

The State Allocation Board is continued in existence for the purposes of this chapter. The members of the board and the Members of the Legislature meeting with the board shall receive no compensation for their services under this chapter but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties hereunder, to be paid out of the State School Building Aid Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16007.

The board by the adoption of rules shall give priority in allocating funds to districts to those districts where the children will benefit most from additional schoolhouse facilities. This priority shall be based on acuteness of overcrowding, on rapidity of growth in attendance, and on the time the district’s application has been ready for allotment. The board may make exceptions when it determines that it will be for the benefit of the children affected.

The State Department of Education shall assist and cooperate with the
 board in determining priorities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16008.

In allocating funds under this chapter, the board may give first priority to school districts for the replacement and repair of school buildings and necessary facilities appurtenant thereto damaged by any earthquake occurring subsequent to July 1, 1952. All of the provisions of this chapter apply to the districts except the provisions for the establishment of priorities.

Prior to making any apportionment under this section, the State Allocation Board may secure from the Department of General Services, a report showing the
 urgency of the work of replacement or repair for which an application has been filed. The report shall not be conclusive upon the State Allocation Board, but shall be advisory only.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16009.

In addition to any other powers and duties that are granted the board by this chapter, the board shall:

(a) Establish any qualifications not in conflict with other provisions of this chapter that it deems will best serve the purposes of this chapter for determining the eligibility of school districts to apportionments of funds under this chapter.

(b) Establish any procedures and policies in connection with the administration of, and the
 expenditure of funds made available for the purpose of, this chapter that it deems necessary and which are not in conflict with the powers and duties of the State Department of Education or of the director granted or imposed by this chapter.

(c) Adopt any rules and regulations for the administration of this chapter, requiring the procedure, forms, and information, that it may deem necessary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16010.

The State Department of Education, in addition to any responsibilities or approvals required under Sections 39000 to 39323, inclusive, shall provide the following services to school districts making applications for apportionments under this chapter:

(1) It shall assist school districts in organizing a comprehensive planning effort. It shall guide a planning process through its appropriate steps and, when requested by a school district, it shall provide the school district with sources of expertise,
 either public or private, which may be able to contribute to the development of plans to find solutions for specific problems a school district may have.

(2) It shall provide continuing research in relation to all phases of educational programs and the school facilities that are required to implement these educational programs.

(3) It shall provide a review and evaluation service to school districts to assure the effectiveness of the facilities that have been provided in accommodating educational programs.

(4) It shall provide communication media through publications, seminars, and prepare planning guides and procedures containing recommendations, which guides shall be used to disseminate educational planning information to all school districts.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16011.

Each school district which desires an apportionment of funds under this chapter shall, unless specifically exempted by the board, prepare a long-range comprehensive master plan for the district prepared in accordance with acceptable planning procedures. Information relating to the following factors should be included in this master plan:

(a) A statement of the educational programs and goals of the district in relation to its programs, both current and future.

(b) A comprehensive evaluation and report of the utilization of the school facilities now existing in the district.

(c) A comprehensive demographic study of the district, as it currently exists and as projected into the future.

(d) A policy statement regarding actual or potential human problems.

(e) A policy statement as to the priority in which the district proposes to solve its school housing problems.

(f) A policy statement regarding cooperation with other local public agencies to achieve total community development.

(g) A policy to insure continuous review so that plans will be kept up to date and changing conditions will be
 reviewed and accommodated by appropriate revision of plans.

The director shall review the long-range master plan and project development plan and shall report his or her findings and recommendations thereon to the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16012.

The board shall prescribe instructions specifying the manner in which property, real or personal, being replaced through the apportionment, shall be disposed of, and compliance with the instructions shall be a condition upon the making of the apportionment. The net proceeds derived from the disposition shall be contributed in reduction of any apportionment. Any school district affected shall comply with instructions prescribed by the board. The board may require a district to transfer to the state, by any instruments deemed appropriate by the board, title to
 property, whereupon, the board shall dispose of the property in any manner it deems appropriate to insure the highest return to the state, and apply the proceeds therefrom in reduction of apportionments to the district. The district affected shall do all things deemed necessary by the board to implement the disposition. Whenever the board determines it to be in the best interests of the state, an apportionment may be made for the demolition of any facilities replaced through an apportionment. This section shall be applicable to property replaced by apportionments heretofore or hereafter made under this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16013.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the board may grant priority in the apportioning of funds to school districts to those districts which have sold facilities replaced under a previous application and have applied the proceeds therefrom in reduction of prior apportionments to the district. Apportionments so made shall not be in excess of the amount of the proceeds which were applied to prior apportionments subsequent to July 1, 1970, and shall be made only for projects which were approved by the board prior to July 1, 1970.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16014.

Apportionment from the State School Building Aid Fund to school districts shall be made in the manner and subject to the conditions herein provided and in accordance with policies adopted by the board, for the following purposes, all of which purposes are hereby declared to be, and are, public works:

(a) The purchase and improvement of schoolsites which have been approved by the State Department of Education.

(b) The purchase of necessary
 desks, tables, chairs and other movable furniture and equipment, as approved by the State Department of Education.

(c) The planning and construction, reconstruction, alteration of, the moving of portable classroom buildings on an existing site or to another schoolsite, and addition to, school buildings, including built-in or fixed equipment, for any facilities that are approved by the State Department of Education as essential, except a room used solely for an auditorium for a school of any type or class and a room used solely for a gymnasium or a room used solely for a cafeteria for elementary schools. This section does not prohibit the State Department of Education from approving multipurpose rooms which are rooms designed to be used for two or more of the following purposes:

(1) Classroom.

(2) Auditorium.

(3) Gymnasium.

(4) Cafeteria.

(5) Any other purposes that district requires which are approved by the State Department of Education.

Where a district is required by a contract entered into between itself and a contractor, to obtain at its own expense insurance covering risks incurred during any construction, reconstruction or alteration for which an apportionment has been made, the cost thereof may be paid either directly, or by way of reimbursement, to the district out of the apportionment, or out of any apportionment made specifically covering the insurance. However, in other respects the apportionments are eligible for payment under this chapter.

In addition to the foregoing, the board may make an apportionment to a school district
 for the purchase from another school district of existing facilities, real or personal, including the site thereof, or any portion of any of the foregoing, providing that the board finds that it is economical and good practice on the part of the acquiring district to purchase the same, and that the consideration to be paid in the light of all the circumstances surrounding the transfer is fair and equitable both to the acquiring district and to the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16015.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the board may make an apportionment to any school district for the cost of leasing portable classrooms during the period in which additional school facilities are being constructed by a previously approved project, provided that each of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) The district has received a final apportionment for the previously approved project and the construction of which has not yet been completed.

(b) Estimates of average daily attendance used for justifying the previously approved project indicate either of the following:

(1) An increase over the base period of projection of at least 15 percent.

(2) A substantial number of district classes being on triple session during the period of construction, as determined by the State Allocation Board.

(c) The district is making maximum use of its existing facilities through the operation of one or more continuous school programs.

Any apportionment made to a school district pursuant to this section shall be added to the final apportionment for the previously approved project specified in subdivision (a), and the repayment thereof by the school district shall be made
 under the same terms and conditions as prescribed for the final apportionment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16016.

A leasehold or use permit interest held by a school district in land owned in fee simple by the government of the United States may, for all purposes of this chapter, be deemed a purchase of land by the district and to vest title and ownership in the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16017.

The board shall not make any apportionment with respect to an application for replacing inadequate school facilities unless it has first investigated and made a finding that it would not be economical or good practice to rehabilitate said facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16018.

In addition to the purposes for which apportionments may be made to school districts under Section 16014, apportionments may also be made to school districts for the construction, repair, attachment or development of offsite facilities, utilities or improvements which the board determines are necessary to the proper operation or functioning of the school facilities for which apportionments are made, all of which purposes are hereby declared to be, and are, public works.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16019.

In making applications for, and in expending apportionments of funds under this chapter, a school district acts as an agent of the state and all sites purchased and improved, all equipment purchased, and all buildings constructed, reconstructed, altered, or added to through the expenditure of funds apportioned under this chapter, are declared to be, and are, the property of the state.

The Director of General Services shall file with the county recorder of the county in which any site purchased or improved through the
 expenditure of funds apportioned under this chapter is located a certificate, properly acknowledged, indicating the state’s interest in real property of the district by virtue of this section, without the necessity of particularizing the real property. The recorder shall record and index the certificate in the same manner as abstracts of judgments and the certificate shall constitute constructive notice of the state’s interest in the particular real property affected. The certificate shall as to any party thereafter acquiring real property or any interest therein in the county from the school district have the same force, effect and priority as if it had been a judgment lien imposed upon real property which was not exempt from execution. This effect shall commence upon recordation and continue until the certificate is discharged or released as provided herein.

Upon request the Director of General Services shall do each of the following:

(a) Issue a release of the state’s interest in any real property or a portion thereof that the district has been authorized by the board to dispose of under Section 16105, provided that delivery of the release may be subject to any conditions that may be prescribed by the board to protect the state’s interest.

(b) Issue a disclaimer of the state’s interest in any real property or a portion thereof of the district, the disposition of which the board is not required to consent to under the terms of Section 16105, provided that the delivery of the disclaimer may be subject to any conditions that the board deems appropriate to protect the interests of the state, including conditions relating to the amount of consideration to be received from the disposition where the board asserts an interest in the proceeds of the disposition under other provisions of this chapter. The release or
 disclaimer shall conclusively protect any third party relying upon the same and shall be acknowledged to permit recordation by the county recorder.

Upon payment by the district of all amounts required to be paid by it or on its behalf to the state under this chapter each of the following shall occur:

(a) The Director of General Services shall file with the recorder a release of any certificate. The release shall be recorded and indexed in the same index as the certificate.

(b) The title to personal property purchased by the school district with funds apportioned under this chapter shall revert to the school district without further action by the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16020.

The board may require school districts to insure for the benefit of the state all sites, equipment, and buildings which are under Section 16019 the property of the state, against any risk and in any amounts that the board may deem necessary to protect the interests of the state. No state funds apportioned under this chapter shall be used to pay the premiums on the insurance.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16021.

A school district shall not expend money apportioned under this chapter unless the contracts under which the funds are expended have been let after competitive bids thereafter pursuant to this code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16022.

Funds apportioned to a school district under Section 16024 for a project, remaining unencumbered or unexpended one year from the date the application of the district for apportionment was approved, shall not be encumbered or expended except as provided in this section.

The governing board of the district shall notify the board of its desire to encumber or expend funds. The board shall immediately request the State Department of Education to, and the department shall, review the project for which apportionment was made. If
 the State Department of Education finds that the conditions existing at the time it approved the project for which the apportionment was made have so changed that the needs of the district are less than originally determined, it shall notify the board of its findings and of the respects in which the project should accordingly be modified. The board shall review the project and revise the project in any manner that it deems necessary subject to Section 16067, and make any changes in the purposes for which the apportionment may be expended that it deems necessary. The cost of the project as revised by the board shall be computed in the manner prescribed by Section 16024 and the excess, if any, of the amount theretofore apportioned to the district over the computed cost of the revised project shall be deducted by the board from the apportionment made to the district. The board shall give notice of its action, in writing, to the Controller, the governing board of the district, and the county auditor and the
 county treasurer having jurisdiction over the state school building fund of the district. If the amount of the excess, or any portion thereof, has not been paid to the district, the excess, or portion thereof, shall be made available for apportionment to other districts, if the excess, or portion thereof, has been paid to the district, it shall not be encumbered or expended by the district and shall become due and payable to the State of California. The governing board of the district and the county treasurer shall pay the amount to the Treasurer, out of the funds, and in the manner specified in Section 16100. The payment shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the State School Building Aid Fund in the State Treasury.

It shall be the duty of the governing body and county treasurer to make the payments to the Treasurer as provided in this section, and it shall be the duty of the Controller to enforce the collection on behalf of the state.

This section does not authorize the board to increase any apportionment made to a school district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16023.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, a district may apply, on a separate application, for an apportionment for the purchase of laboratory and vocational training equipment, whether or not the equipment is for use in connection with a construction project.

All of the provisions of this chapter apply to the application and apportionment except that:

(a) Any application for the equipment pursuant to this section which is received by the board
 shall be transmitted to the State Department of Education. If the State Department of Education approves the application, it shall refer it to the board which shall either approve or reject the application pursuant to Section 16024. Any provision of Section 16024 inconsistent with this section shall not apply to the application.

(b) Section 16007 does not apply.

(c) If the application is approved and an apportionment granted therefor the district shall repay the full amount of the apportionment and the interest thereon. The repayment of the apportionment, and the interest thereon, may be over a period of years, not to exceed 20 years from the first day of January of the fiscal year next succeeding the fiscal year in which the apportionment became final. The number of years allowed for repayment shall be determined by the board at the time it fixes interest on the apportionment.
 The repayment is in addition to any other repayment required under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16024.

Each school district that desires an apportionment for a grade level maintained by it, shall submit through its governing board to the board an application therefor in the form and number of copies as the board shall prescribe. Each copy of the application shall be accompanied by a statement of the estimated cost of the project certified by an architect or structural engineer, and by layout plans showing the entire construction project for which the district desires an apportionment. Before the board approves an application for a construction project and makes an
 apportionment pursuant to this chapter, it shall, after consultation with the Department of General Services, establish standards for all new construction included therein. After this consultation the board shall establish current construction cost standards for that construction. The standards shall not exceed typical comparable new construction by school districts in the same area not receiving or eligible for apportionment under this chapter, or if there has been no new construction by school districts in the area, the standards shall not exceed the reasonable current cost of similar construction in the area. The board shall determine these typical current costs or reasonable current costs. In applying those standards the board shall take into account the size and type of the construction proposed and may make deviations as in their judgment are justified. When a standard has been set by the board to cover any individual apportionment, no apportionment shall be made by the board in excess of that
 standard, unless the board shall find that in view of a rapid increase in building costs an adjustment is warranted. Immediately upon receipt of an application in the prescribed form accompanied by the required estimate of cost, a copy thereof shall be transmitted by the board to the director and to the Director of General Services.

A school district shall not let any contract for new construction included in an application for a construction project that has been approved by the board if the cost exceeds the construction cost standards fixed by the board under this section for that new construction. 

A school district may at any time amend or supplement its application. 

Each construction project for which a district applies for an apportionment shall be applied for on a separate application and shall be considered separately by the board. If a district applies for more than one
 construction project, at the same time or at different times, the priority points of the district shall be recalculated after the approval of each separate construction project and before a subsequent construction project is approved. 

The board shall require the changes in the plans that an applicant school district submits with its application as the board determines is necessary or desirable to reduce the cost of the project. The board may also, by rule, provide for the vesting in the director or in the Director of General Services of the responsibility for requiring those changes, according to whether the subject matter of the change is subject to the jurisdiction or approval of the director or the Director of General Services, respectively. 

The board may, for good cause as it shall determine, reduce the amount of, or modify any provisions relating to, any contribution required of a school district under the terms of